Arkansas, session 2025, SB296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-101(d)(1), concerning the establishment
and alteration of precinct boundaries, polling sites, and vote centers, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) Except for school elections under § 6-14-106, the The
polling sites for each election shall be the same as those established for
the immediately preceding general election unless changed by order of the
county board of election commissioners.
(B) Subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section does not apply
to:
(i) A school election under § 6-14-106; or
(ii) An additional early voting location chosen by
the county board of election commissioners.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-401(b), concerning the duties of the
county clerk, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The county clerk shall be furnished a suitable room at the county
*SSS139*
02/25/2025 9:07:28 AM SSS139

SB296
courthouse or other location within the county seat designated for the
purpose of exercising all the powers and duties concerning the application
for, the issuance of, and the voting of absentee and early voting ballots
required by law of the county clerk.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-418(a)(1)(A), concerning early voting,
is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section,
early voting shall be available to any qualified elector who applies to the
county clerk's designated early voting location within the county seat,
beginning fifteen (15) days before a preferential primary or general election
between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 6:00 p.m. Monday through Friday and 10:00
a.m. and 4:00 p.m. Saturday and ending at 5:00 p.m. on the Monday before the
election.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-5-418(b)(1)(B), concerning early voting,
is amended to read as follows:
(B) The For each election, the county board of election
commissioners shall determine by unanimous vote the location of additional
polling sites for early voting.
















02/25/2025 9:07:28 AM SSS139